Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201244-8102
Purpose of act.

The
purpose of the Nebraska Protection in Annuity Transactions Act is to require insurers to establish a system
to supervise recommendations and to set forth standards and procedures
for recommendations made by insurance producers and insurers to consumers
regarding annuity transactions so that consumers' insurance needs and financial
objectives at the time of the transaction are appropriately addressed.

Laws 2006, LB 875, § 14;

Laws 2007, LB117, § 27;

Laws 2012, LB887, § 22.
July 19, 2012